Florida, session 2026, HB6519.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The facts stated in the preamble to this act
are found and declared to be true.
Section 2. The Orange County Sheriff's Office is
authorized and directed to appropriate from funds of the county
not otherwise appropriated or encumbered and to draw a warrant
in the sum of $20,721,629.23 plus interest payable to Sean
Hurley as compensation for injuries and damages sustained due to
the negligence of the Orange County Sheriff's Office.
Section 3. The amount paid by the Orange County Sheriff's
Office pursuant to s. 768.28, Florida Statutes, and the amount
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6519-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S

HB 6519 2026
awarded under this act are intended to provide the sole
compensation for all present and future claims arising out of
the factual situation described in this act which resulted in
injuries and damages to Sean Hurley. The total amount paid for
attorney fees relating to this claim may not exceed 25 percent
of the total amount awarded under this act.
Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb6519-00